Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-1140
School district; amount paid to service agency; determination.

Except as provided in sections 79-232 to 79-246, each school district shall pay an amount equal to the average per pupil cost of the service agency of the preceding year or the cost as agreed upon pursuant to the contract to the agency providing the educational program for every child with a disability who is a resident of the district and is attending an educational program not operated by the school district, including programs operated by the State Department of Education, the Department of Health and Human Services, and any other service agency whose programs are approved by the State Department of Education.

Laws 1973, LB 403, § 7;

Laws 1974, LB 863, § 6;

Laws 1977, LB 443, § 3;

Laws 1978, LB 871, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-647;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 30;

Laws 1989, LB 183, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3330;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 822;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 822;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 29;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 36;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 42;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 56.
July 21, 2016
Option enrollment program, exemption from payment responsibility for resident school district, see section 79-246.